ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ヨガ・ピラティス > ピラティスマシン > ピラティスリフォーマー: ピラティスリフォーマーアクセサリー
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Joga i pilates > Sprave za pilates > Reformeri za pilates: Dodaci za reformer za pilates
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 瑜珈和皮拉提斯 > 皮拉提斯機 > 皮拉提斯塑身機: 皮拉提斯核心床配件
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Jóga és pilátesz > Piláteszgépek > Piláteszreformátorok: Pilates reformer kiegészítők
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Γιόγκα & Pilates > Μηχανήματα Pilates > Pilates Reformers: Αξεσουάρ για reformer πιλάτες
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Jooga ja pilates > Pilateslaitteet > Pilates reformer -laitteet: Reformer-laitteiden lisävarusteet
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Joga a pilates > Vybavenie na pilates > Reforméri na pilates: Príslušenstvo k reformeru na pilates
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Yoga & Pilates > Pilates-Geräte > Pilates-Reformer: Zubehör für Pilates-Reformer
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Joga in pilates > Naprave za pilates > Pilates reformerji: Dodatki za pilates reformer
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Yoga och pilates > Pilatesmaskiner > Pilatesreformatorer: Tillbehör för pilatesreformers
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Ioga e pilates > Máquinas de pilates > Máquinas Reformer de pilates: Acessórios para Reformers de Pilates
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Pilates et yoga > Machines pilates > Pilates Reformer: Accessoires de Reformers de Pilates
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Joga ir pilatesas > Pilateso treniruokliai > Pilateso treniruokliai „Reformer“: Pilateso reformerių priedai
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Jóga a pilates > Trenažéry na pilates > Zařízení Pilates Reformer: Příslušenství k reformerům na pilates
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Yoga și Pilates > Aparate pentru Pilates > Aparate reformer pentru Pilates: Accesorii pentru aparate de pilates reformer
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Yoga en pilates > Pilatesapparaten > Pilatesreformers: Accessoires voor pilates-reformers
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Yoga e pilates > Macchine pilates > Riformatori pilates: Accessori per reformer per pilates
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Yoga y pilates > Máquinas de pilates > Reformadores de pilates: Accesorios para reformers de pilates
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Йога и пилатес > Машини за пилатес > Уреди за пилатес Реформър: Аксесоари за пилатес реформъри
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Yoga và Pilate > Máy tập thể dục > Máy reformer Pilate: Phụ kiện máy tập pilates reformer
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Yoga og pilates > Pilatesmaskiner > Pilatesreformatorer: Tilbehør til pilates reformer
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > โยคะและพิลาทีส > เครื่องพิลาทีส > เก้าอี้พิลาทีส รีฟอร์เมอร์: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเครื่องรีฟอร์มเมอร์พิลาทิส
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 瑜伽与普拉提 > 普拉提健身器 > 普拉提塑身机: 普拉提核心床配件
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Йога и пилатес > Тренажеры для пилатеса > Реформеры: Аксессуары для реформеров для пилатеса
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Joga i pilates > Sprzęt do pilatesu > Reformery do pilatesu: Akcesoria do reformerów do pilatesu
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 요가/필라테스 > 필라테스 기구 > 필라테스 리포머: 필라테스 리포머 액세서리
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Yoga ve Pilates > Pilates Makineleri > Pilates Reformerları: Pilates reformer aksesuarları
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Yoga & Pilates > Pilates Machines > Pilates Reformers: Pilates Reformer Accessories
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Yoga e Pilates > Aparelhos para pilates > Reformadores para pilates: Acessórios para reformers de pilates
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Yoga og pilates > Pilatesmaskiner > Pilates-reformatorer: Tilbehør til pilates-reformere